Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.395

Administrative action—Hearing—Judicial review—Judgment.

(1) A person who, in an administrative action by the director, is found to have knowingly or recklessly violated any provision of this chapter, or any rule or order under this chapter, may be fined, after notice and opportunity for hearing, in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each violation.

(2) A person who, in an administrative action by the director, is found to have knowingly or recklessly violated an administrative order issued under RCW 21.20.110 or 21.20.390 shall pay an administrative fine in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars for each violation.

(3) The fines paid under subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be deposited into the securities prosecution fund.

(4) If a petition for judicial review has not been timely filed under RCW 34.05.542(2), a certified copy of the director's order requiring payment of the fine may be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county of this state. The clerk shall treat the order of the director in the same manner as a judgment of the superior court. The director's order so filed has the same effect as a judgment of the superior court and may be recorded, enforced, or satisfied in like manner.

[ 2003 c 288 s 6; 1998 c 15 s 18.]